Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/rw_RW.aff
# For help, email rwanda@kasahorow.org
# This is in the public domain--do good with it.
SET UTF-8 
TRY aiuenorbkmygwthszd'cIAjKUvfNMplBGYRPTHSDWCOZELV-JF
LANG rw

KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm        #QWERTY keyboard assumption

IGNORE -                                #Ignore hyphens in hyphenated words

PFX 81 N 10                             #Noun Class affixes (preprefix+prefix)
PFX 81   0       umu    . 
PFX 81   0       aba    .
PFX 81   0       imi    .
PFX 81   0       in     .
PFX 81   0       igi    .
PFX 81   0       ibi    .
PFX 81   0       uku    .
PFX 81   0       ama    .
PFX 81   0       aka    .
PFX 81   0       utu    .
